Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-35,111
Hospital authority; bonds; default; remedies of obligees.

Any authority shall have power by its trust indenture, lease or other contract to confer upon any obligee holding or representing a specified amount in bonds, lease or other obligations the right upon the happening of an event of default as defined in such instrument:

(1) By suit, action or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction to obtain the appointment of a receiver of any hospital facility or facilities of the authority or any part or parts thereof. If such receiver be appointed, he may enter and take possession of such hospital facility or facilities or any part or parts thereof and operate and maintain the same, and collect and receive all income, fees, rents, revenue, or other charges thereafter arising therefrom in the same manner as the authority itself might do and shall keep such money in a separate account or accounts and apply the same in accordance with the obligations of the authority as the court shall direct; or

(2) By suit, action or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction to require the authority and the trustees thereof to account as if it and they were the trustees of an express trust.

Laws 1971, LB 54, § 38;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.111.